res/g2p.twolc
Alphabet

      %  ! space
      %-

      Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ
      Ъ:0 Ь:0
      А   Е   Ё:О́ И О У Ы Э   Ю:У Я
      А́ А̂ Е́:Э́ Ё́   И́ О́ У́ Ы́ Э́ Э̂ Ю́:У́ Я́:А́
      А̀   Ѐ   Ё̀   Ѝ О̀ У̀ Ы̀ Э̀   Ю̀   Я̀

      б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ
      ъ:0 ь:0
      а   е   ё:о́ и  о у ы э   ю:у я   ʌ
      а́ â е́:э́ ё́   и́  о́ у́ ы́ э́ э̂ ю́:у́ я́:а́ '    ! ё́ is included to broaden coverage
      а̀   ѐ   ё̀   ѝ  о̀ у̀ ы̀ э̀   ю̀   я̀ ;

Sets

Letter = А Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж З И Й К Л М Н О П Р С Т У Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я
         А́         Е́ Ё́     И́           О́         У́               Ы́   Э́ Ю́ Я́
         А̀         Ѐ Ё̀     Ѝ           О̀         У̀               Ы̀   Э̀ Ю̀ Я̀
         а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н о п р с т у ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я
         а́         е́ ё́     и́           о́         у́               ы́   э́ ю́ я́
         а̀         ѐ ё̀     ѝ           о̀         у̀               ы̀   э̀ ю̀ я̀
         %- %  ;

! Consonants
C = Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ
    б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ;

! Consonants, excluding { Ж ж Й й Ч ч Ш ш Щ щ Ц ц }
CNoSoftHard = Б В Г Д З К Л М Н П Р С Т Ф Х
              б в г д з к л м н п р с т ф х ;

! Unvoiced and paired consonants
UnvoicedPairedC = К П С Т Ф Ш
                  к п с т ф ш ;

! Voiced and paired consonants
VoicedPairedC = Б В Г Д Ж З
                б в г д ж з ;

! Voiced and paired consonants
VoicedPairedCNoB = Б Г Д Ж З
                   б г д ж з ;

! Soft consonants
SoftC = Й Ч Щ
        й ч щ ;

! Hard consonants
HardC = Ж Ц Ш
        ж ц ш ;

! Labials for Softness Assimilation
LAB = Б б В в М м П п Ф ф ;

! Dentals for Softness Assimilation
DEN = Д д З з Л л Н н Р р С с Т т Ц ц ;

! Velars for Softness Assimilation
VEL = Г г К к Х х ;

! Vowels
V = А Е Ё И О У Ы Э Ю Я
    А́ Е́ Ё́ И́ О́ У́ Ы́ Э́ Ю́ Я́
    А̀ Ѐ Ё̀ Ѝ О̀ У̀ Ы̀ Э̀ Ю̀ Я̀
    а е ё и о у ы э ю я
    а́ е́ ё́ и́ о́ у́ ы́ э́ ю́ я́
    а̀ ѐ ё̀ ѝ о̀ у̀ ы̀ э̀ ю̀ я̀ ;

! Stressed vowels
StressedV = А́ Е́ Ё́ Ё И́ О́ У́ Ы́ Э́ Ю́ Я́
            а́ е́ ё́ ё и́ о́ у́ ы́ э́ ю́ я́ ;

! Unstressed vowels
UnstressedV = А Е И О У Ы Э Ю Я
              а е и о у ы э ю я ;

! Vowels that indicate softness
SoftV = Е Ё И Ю Я
        Е́ Ё́ И́ Ю́ Я́
        е ё и ю я
        е́ ё́ и́ ю́ я́ ;

Definitions

Rules

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 00: Soften consonants before 'soft' vowels and ь (excluding { Ж ж Ц ц Ш ш Ч ч Щ щ Й й })"
0:' <=> CNoSoftHard: _ [ SoftV: | ь: ] ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 01: 0>й (lowercase) between vowels, word-initially, and after hard-/soft-signs"
0:й <=>  [ V: | ь: | ъ: | .#. ] _ [ ю́: | ю: | ё: | я́: | я: | е́: | е: ] ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 02: 0>Й (uppercase) between vowels, word-initially, and after hard-/soft-signs"
0:Й <=>  [ V: | Ь: | Ъ: | .#. ] _ [ Ю́: | Ю: | Ё: | Я́: | Я: | Е́: | Е: ] ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 03: 0>й (lowercase) after hard-/soft-signs"
! TODO: Does this also work after the beginning of a word? иголка
0:й <=> [ ь: | ъ: ] _ [ и́: | и: ];

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 04: 0>Й (uppercase) after hard-/soft-signs"
0:Й <=> [ Ь: | Ъ: ] _ [ И́: | И: ];

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 05: Yeri rule: after hard consonants и is pronounced as ы"
Vx:Vy <=> HardC _ ;
where Vx in ( И́ И и́ и )
      Vy in ( Ы́ Ы ы́ ы )
  matched ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 06: Akanje: Unstressed vowel reduction for { о а } in pre-tonic location and word-initially"
Vx:Vy <=> [: - StressedV:] _ [:C | ь: | :']* StressedV: ;
          .#. _ ;
where Vx in ( О о А а )
      Vy in ( ʌ ʌ ʌ ʌ )
  matched ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 07: Akanje: Unstressed vowel reduction for { о а } in non-pre-tonic and post-tonic location"
Vx:Vy <=> [: - .#.] _ [ [ C: | ь: | :']* UnstressedV: [ C: | ь: | :']* ]+ StressedV: ;
          StressedV: :* _ [: - StressedV:]* .#. ;
where Vx in ( О о А а )
      Vy in ( Ъ ъ Ъ ъ )
  matched ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 08: Tense я́ and е́"
Vx:Vy <=> [ :CNoSoftHard :' | :SoftC ] _ [ :CNoSoftHard :' | :SoftC ] ;
where Vx in ( Я́ я́ А́ а́ Е́ е́ )
      Vy in ( А̂ а̂ А̂ а̂ Э̂ э̂ )
 matched ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 09: Ikanje: Unstressed vowel reduction for { я е } in pre-tonic location"
Vx:Vy <=> [: - [ HardC: ]] _ [:C | ь: | :']* StressedV: ;
where Vx in ( Я я Е е )
      Vy in ( И и И и )
 matched ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 10: Ikanje: Unstressed vowel reduction for { я е } in non-pre-tonic location, word-initially and post-tonic"
Vx:Vy <=> [: - [ HardC: ]] _ [ [ C: | ь: | :']* UnstressedV: [ C: | ь: | :']* ]+ StressedV: ;
         StressedV: [: - [ HardC:]]* _ [: - StressedV:]* .#. ;
where Vx in ( Я я Е е )
      Vy in ( Ь ь Ь ь )
matched ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 11: Ykanje: unstressed vowel reduction for { е } after { ж ш ц } in pre-tonic location"
Vx:Vy <=> .#. [: - StressedV:]* HardC: _ [ C: | ь: | :']* StressedV: ;
where Vx in ( Е е )
      Vy in ( Ы ы )
  matched ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 12: Ykanje: unstressed е after { ж ш ц } in non-pre-tonic location"
Vx:Vy <=> HardC: _ [ [ C: | ь: | :']* UnstressedV: [ C: | ь: | :']* ]+ StressedV: ;
          StressedV: :* HardC: _ ;
where Vx in ( Е е )
      Vy in ( Ъ ъ )
  matched ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 13: Voice Assimilation: Final devoicing"
Cx:Cy <=> _ [ :' | :0 ]* .#. ;
where Cx in ( Б б В в Г г Д д Ж ж З з )
      Cy in ( П п Ф ф К к Т т Ш ш С с )
  matched ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 14: Unvoiced Assimilation: Consonant clusters with unvoiced consonant at end of the cluster"
Cx:Cy <=>  _ [ :' | :0 ]* :UnvoicedPairedC ;
where Cx in ( Б б В в Г г Д д Ж ж З з )
      Cy in ( П п Ф ф К к Т т Ш ш С с )
  matched ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 15: Voice Assimilation: Consonant clusters with voiced consonant at end of the cluster"
Cx:Cy <=>  _ [ :' | :0 ]* :VoicedPairedCNoB ;
where Cx in ( П п Ф ф К к Т т Ш ш С с )
      Cy in ( Б б В в Г г Д д Ж ж З з )
  matched ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 16: Softness Assimilation: Dentals"
0:' <=>:DEN _ :DEN :' ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 17: Softness Assimilation: Labials, { В в } doesn't force assimilation"
0:' <=> :LAB _ :LAB :' ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 18: Softness Assimilation: Velar"
0:' <=> :VEL _ :VEL :' ;



!! Rules to define
!!! ============================================================================
!TODO: In endings like ят it could be a noun and thus wouldn't have the same pronunciation as the verb form
! алкоголя́т (although this is stressed, are there any other examples?)
! TODO: identify where this is misfiring (e.g. wrong pos)
!"Ikanje: Unstressed vowel reduction for { я } in word-ending"
!Vx:Vy <=> _ [ т: | т: с: я: | с: ь: | х: | м: | м: и: ]? .#. ;
!
!where Vx in ( Я я )
!      Vy in ( Ъ ъ )
! matched ;
!
!!! ============================================================================
!"Conversion of { ого его } in endings to { ово 'эво }"
!TODO: Do we just list out several words that change this way?
!
!!! ============================================================================
!"Conversion of { тс } in endings { ятся } to { ц }"
!TODO:

!!! в коридоре -> get rid of spaces
